Washington statutes.
RCW 1.16.030

"Fiscal year"—School districts and other taxing districts.

August 31st shall end the fiscal year of school districts and December 31st of all other taxing districts.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 21; 1909 c 76 s 13; RRS s 9963.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118: See note following RCW 28A.505.010.